nlp-tools/dict/ne_NP.aff
FLAG num
SFX 44 Y 160
SFX 44 0 ँदारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नेथियो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरिरहेको [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नेगर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन्न [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्ला [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नलाग्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभएनछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभएर [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभएको [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभएन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभएका [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुभएछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्दा [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्दो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरेर [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरेको [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरेन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरेका [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्ने [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपरे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुपर्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुने [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदै [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदा [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहोस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहोला [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुनेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुने [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदै [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदा [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदैन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहोस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहोला [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुनेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 ँदोरहेछु [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 ँदोरहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 ँदारहेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 ँदोरहेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 ँदोरहेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसके [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नु [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्ने [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दि [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छु [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छेस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छिन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्छे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थिस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थ्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थि [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्थिन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दैनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दैनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दैनन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछु [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दैनथे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेनन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेर [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकोस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकुन्जेल [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिनस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिँन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिनन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकि [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिएला [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकुन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकुँ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेको [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकेका [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्ला [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकिएछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसक्दछ [^उइि्] 
SFX 44 0 िएछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 ि/43X [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 दारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदै [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदा [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदै [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदा [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदैन [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 दोरहेछु [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 दोरहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 दारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 दोरहेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 दोरहेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 44 0 नसकु [^उइि्]

SFX 45 Y 158
SFX 45 0 ँदारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नेथियो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरिरहेको [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नेगर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन्न [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्ला [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्दछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नलाग्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभएनछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभएर [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभएको [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभएन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभएका [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुभएछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्दा [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्दो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरेर [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरेको [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरेन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरेका [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्ने [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपरे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुपर्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुने [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदै [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदा [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहोस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहोला [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुनेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुने [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदै [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदा [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदैन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुँदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहोस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहोला [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुनेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दोरहेछु [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दोरहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दारहेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दोरहेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दोरहेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसके [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नु [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्ने [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दि [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छु [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छेस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छिन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्छे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थिस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थ्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थ्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थि [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्थिन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दैन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दैनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दैनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दैनन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछु [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेछौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दैनथे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्यौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्यौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेनन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेर [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेनौँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकोस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकुन्जेल [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिनस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिँन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिनौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिनन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकि [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिनेछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिएला [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकुन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिछस् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिछन् [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकुँ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेको [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकेका [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्ला [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नेबारे [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नुहुन्छ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नुभयो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्नुहुन्थ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकिएछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसक्दछ [^उइि्] 
SFX 45 0 िएछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 ाउ/42X [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 ाइ/43X [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 ि/43X [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदै [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदा [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदै [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदा [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदैन [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदैछ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नुहुदैनथ्यो [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 दारहेछौ [^उइि्]
SFX 45 0 नसकु [^उइि्]
